New Jersey, session 222, A528.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 18 of P.L.2019, c.59 (C.26:16-18) is amended to read as follows: 18.  a.  A person who, without authorization of the patient, and with the intent or effect of causing the patients death, willfully alters or forges a request for medication pursuant to P.L.2019, c.59 (C.26:16-1 et al.) or conceals or destroys a rescission of that request, is guilty of a crime of the [second] first degree. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:43-6, a person convicted of a crime pursuant to this subsection shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall include a mandatory minimum term of 25 years, during which time the defendant shall not be eligible for parole. The court may not suspend or make any other non-custodial disposition of any person sentenced pursuant to this section. b.    A person who coerces or exerts undue influence on a patient to request medication pursuant to P.L.2019, c.59 (C.26:16-1 et al.) or to destroy a rescission of a request is guilty of a crime of the [third] first degree. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:43-6, a person convicted of a crime pursuant to this subsection shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall include a mandatory minimum term of 25 years, during which time the defendant shall not be eligible for parole.  The court may not suspend or make any other non-custodial disposition of any person sentenced pursuant to this section. c.    Theft of medication prescribed to a qualified terminally ill patient pursuant to P.L.2019, c.59 (C.26:16-1 et al.) shall constitute an offense involving theft of a controlled dangerous substance as set forth in N.J.S.2C:20-2. d.    Nothing in P.L.2019, c.59 (C.26:16-1 et al.) shall limit liability for civil damages resulting from the negligence or intentional misconduct of any person. e.    The penalties set forth in this section shall not preclude the imposition of any other criminal penalty applicable under law for conduct that is inconsistent with the provisions of P.L.2019, c.59 (C.26:16-1 et al.). (cf: P.L.2019, c.59, s.18) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day following enactment.